Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-2275
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Nebraska Senior Volunteer Program Act:

(1) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services; and

(2) Senior volunteer means an individual who is sixty years of age or older.

Laws 2000, LB 1101, § 4;

Laws 2017, LB417, § 20.